Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.081

License—Duration—Renewal.

Farm labor contractors may hold either a one-year license or a two-year license, at the director's discretion.

The one-year license shall run to and include the 31st day of December next following the date thereof unless sooner revoked by the director. A license may be renewed each year upon the payment of the annual license fee, but the director shall require that evidence of a renewed bond be submitted and that the contractor have a bond in full force and effect.

The two-year license shall run to and include the 31st day of December of the year following the year of issuance unless sooner revoked by the director. This license may be renewed every two years under the same terms as the one-year license, except that a farm labor contractor possessing a two-year license shall have evidence of a bond in full force and effect, and file an application on which he or she shall disclose all information required by *RCW 19.30.030 (1)(b), (4), and (7).

[ 1987 c 216 s 3; 1986 c 197 s 16; 1985 c 280 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.30.030 was amended by 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 927, changing the subsection numbering.